California, session 20252026, AB528.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1054.10 of the Penal Code is amended to read:1054.10. (a) In any criminal proceeding, any material that constitutes child pornography, and any hardware, media, or other property containing, storing, or housing that material, shall remain in the care, custody, and control of either a law enforcement agency, the prosecution, or the court. For purposes of this section, “child pornography” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2256 of Title 18 of the United States Code.(b) (1) In any criminal proceeding, a court shall deny any request by the defendant, their attorney, anybody employed by the defendant, or anybody else, else to copy, photograph, duplicate, or otherwise reproduce any material that constitutes child pornography so long as the prosecution makes the material, and any hardware, media, or other property containing, storing, or housing that material, reasonably available to the defendant.(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), material or any hardware, media, or other property containing, storing, or housing that material, shall be deemed to be reasonably available to the defendant if the prosecution provides ample opportunity for the inspection, viewing, and examination of that material at the prosecution’s office, a law enforcement agency facility, or court facility by the defendant, the defendant’s attorney, and any individual the defendant may seek to qualify to furnish expert testimony at trial.(c) In any criminal proceeding, a victim, as defined in Section 2259 of Title 18 of the United States Code, victim and the victim’s attorney or any individual the victim may seek to qualify to furnish expert testimony, testimony shall have reasonable access to any material that constitutes child pornography depicting the victim, for inspection, viewing, and examination at the prosecution’s office, a law enforcement agency facility, or court facility, but under no circumstances may material that constitutes child pornography be copied, photographed, duplicated, or otherwise reproduced. This property or material may be redacted to protect the privacy of third parties.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.